Missouri, session 2026, SB1528.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 198.073 and 335.081, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 198.073 and 335.081, to read as follows:
198.073. 1. A residential care facility shall admit
or retain only those persons who are capable mentally and
physically of negotiating a normal path to safety using
assistive devices or aids when necessary, and who may need
assisted personal care within the limitations of such
facilities, and who do not require hospitalization or
skilled nursing care.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, those persons previously qualified for
residence who may have a temporary period of incapacity due
to illness, surgery, or injury, which period does not exceed
forty-five days, may be allowed to remain in a residential
care facility or assisted living facility if approved by a
physician.
3. Any facility licensed as a residential care
facility II on August 27, 2006, shall be granted a license
as an assisted living facility, as defined in section

SB 1528 2
198.006, on August 28, 2006, regardless of the laws, rules,
and regulations for licensure as an assisted living facility
as long as such facility continues to meet all laws, rules,
and regulations that were in place on August 27, 2006, for a
residential care facility II. At such time that the average
total reimbursement, not including residents' cost-of-living
increases in their benefits from the Social Security
Administration after August 28, 2006, for the care of
persons eligible for Medicaid in an assisted living facility
is equal to or exceeds forty-one dollars per day, all
facilities with a license as an assisted living facility
shall meet all laws, rules, and regulations for licensure as
an assisted living facility. Nothing in this section shall
be construed to allow any facility that has not met the
requirements of subsections 4 and 6 of this section to care
for any individual with a physical, cognitive, or other
impairment that prevents the individual from safely
evacuating the facility.
4. Any facility licensed as an assisted living
facility, as defined in section 198.006, except for
facilities licensed under subsection 3 of this section, may
admit or retain an individual for residency in an assisted
living facility only if the individual does not require
hospitalization or skilled nursing placement, and only if
the facility:
(1) Provides for or coordinates oversight and services
to meet the needs of the resident as documented in a written
contract signed by the resident, or legal representative of
the resident;
(2) Has twenty-four-hour staff appropriate in numbers
and with appropriate skills to provide such services;

SB 1528 3
(3) Has a written plan for the protection of all
residents in the event of a disaster, including keeping
residents in place, evacuating residents to areas of refuge,
evacuating residents from the building if necessary, or
other methods of protection based on the disaster and the
individual building design;
(4) Completes a pre-move-in screening with
participation of the prospective resident;
(5) Completes for each resident a community-based
assessment, as defined in subdivision (7) of section 198.006:
(a) Upon admission;
(b) At least semiannually; and
(c) Whenever a significant change has occurred in the
resident's condition which may require a change in services;
(6) Based on the assessment in subsection 7 of this
section and subdivision (5) of this subsection, develops an
individualized service plan in partnership with the
resident, or legal representative of the resident, that
outlines the needs and preferences of the resident. The
individualized service plan will be reviewed with the
resident, or legal representative of the resident, at least
annually, or when there is a significant change in the
resident's condition which may require a change in
services. The signatures of an authorized representative of
the facility and the resident, or the resident's legal
representative, shall be contained on the individualized
service plan to acknowledge that the service plan has been
reviewed and understood by the resident or legal
representative;
(7) Makes available and implements self-care,
productive and leisure activity programs which maximize and
encourage the resident's optimal functional ability;

SB 1528 4
(8) Ensures that the residence does not accept or
retain a resident who:
(a) Has exhibited behaviors that present a reasonable
likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others;
(b) Requires physical restraint;
(c) Requires chemical restraint. As used in this
paragraph, the following terms mean:
a. "Chemical restraint", a psychopharmacologic drug
that is used for discipline or convenience and not required
to treat medical symptoms;
b. "Convenience", any action taken by the facility to
control resident behavior or maintain residents with a
lesser amount of effort by the facility and not in the
resident's best interest;
c. "Discipline", any action taken by the facility for
the purpose of punishing or penalizing residents;
(d) Requires skilled nursing services as defined in
subdivision (23) of section 198.006 for which the facility
is not licensed or able to provide;
100 (e) Requires more than one person to simultaneously
101 physically assist the resident with any activity of daily
102 living, with the exception of bathing and transferring;
103 (f) Is bed-bound or similarly immobilized due to a
104 debilitating or chronic condition; and
105 (9) Develops and implements a plan to protect the
106 rights, privacy, and safety of all residents and to protect
107 against the financial exploitation of all residents;
108 (10) Complies with the training requirements of
109 subsection 7 of section 192.2000.
110 5. Exceptions to paragraphs (d) to (f) of subdivision
111 (8) of subsection 4 of this section shall be made for
112 residents on hospice, provided the resident, designated

SB 1528 5
113 representative, or both, and the assisted living provider,
114 physician, and licensed hospice provider all agree that such
115 program of care is appropriate for the resident.
116 6. If an assisted living facility accepts or retains
117 any individual with a physical, cognitive, or other
118 impairment that prevents the individual from safely
119 evacuating the facility with minimal assistance, the
120 facility shall:
121 (1) Have sufficient staff present and awake twenty-
122 four hours a day to assist in the evacuation;
123 (2) Include an individualized evacuation plan in the
124 service plan of the resident; and
125 (3) Take necessary measures to provide residents with
126 the opportunity to explore the facility and, if appropriate,
127 its grounds; and
128 (4) Use a personal electronic monitoring device for
129 any resident whose physician recommends the use of such
130 device.
131 7. An individual admitted or readmitted to the
132 facility shall have an admission physical examination by a
133 licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or
134 physician assistant. Documentation should be obtained prior
135 to admission but shall be on file not later than ten days
136 after admission and shall contain information regarding the
137 individual's current medical status and any special orders
138 or procedures that should be followed. If the individual is
139 admitted directly from a hospital or another long-term care
140 facility and is accompanied on admission by a report that
141 reflects his or her current medical status, an admission
142 physical shall not be required.
143 8. Facilities licensed as an assisted living facility
144 shall disclose to a prospective resident, or legal

SB 1528 6
145 representative of the resident, information regarding the
146 services the facility is able to provide or coordinate, the
147 costs of such services to the resident, and the resident
148 conditions that will require discharge or transfer,
149 including the provisions of subdivision (8) of subsection 4
150 of this section.
151 9. After January 1, 2008, no entity shall hold itself
152 out as an assisted living facility or advertise itself as an
153 assisted living facility without obtaining a license from
154 the department to operate as an assisted living facility.
155 Any residential care facility II licensed under this chapter
156 that does not use the term assisted living in the name of
157 its licensed facility on or before May 1, 2006, shall be
158 prohibited from using such term after August 28, 2006,
159 unless such facility meets the requirements for an assisted
160 living facility in subsection 4 of this section. Any
161 facility licensed as an intermediate care facility prior to
162 August 28, 2006, that provides the services of an assisted
163 living facility, as described in paragraphs (a), (b), and
164 (c) of subdivision (6) of section 198.006, utilizing the
165 social model of care, may advertise itself as an assisted
166 living facility without obtaining a license from the
167 department to operate as an assisted living facility.
168 10. The department of health and senior services shall
169 promulgate rules to ensure compliance with this section.
170 Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
171 section 536.010, that is created under the authority
172 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
173 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
174 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
175 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
176 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter

SB 1528 7
177 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
178 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
179 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
180 or adopted after August 28, 2006, shall be invalid and void.
335.081. So long as the person involved does not
represent or hold himself or herself out as a nurse licensed
to practice in this state, no provision of sections 335.011
to 335.096 shall be construed as prohibiting:
(1) The practice of any profession for which a license
is required and issued pursuant to the laws of this state by
a person duly licensed to practice that profession;
(2) The services rendered by technicians, nurses'
aides or their equivalent trained and employed in public or
private hospitals and licensed long-term care facilities
except the services rendered in licensed long-term care
facilities shall be limited to administering medication,
excluding the administration of medication by an injectable
route other than:
(a) Insulin; and
(b) Subcutaneous injectable medications, provided that
any such medication was prescribed by the physician for the
long-term care facility resident who receives the medication;
(3) The providing of nursing care by friends or
members of the family of the person receiving such care;
(4) The incidental care of the sick, aged, or infirm
by domestic servants or persons primarily employed as
housekeepers;
(5) The furnishing of nursing assistance in the case
of an emergency situation;
(6) The practice of nursing under proper supervision:

SB 1528 8
(a) As a part of the course of study by students
enrolled in approved schools of professional nursing or in
schools of practical nursing;
(b) By graduates of accredited nursing programs
pending the results of the first licensing examination or
ninety days after graduation, whichever first occurs;
(c) A graduate nurse who is prevented from attending
the first licensing examination following graduation by
reason of active duty in the military may practice as a
graduate nurse pending the results of the first licensing
examination scheduled by the board following the release of
such graduate nurse from active military duty or pending the
results of the first licensing examination taken by the
graduate nurse while involved in active military service
whichever comes first;
(7) The practice of nursing in this state by any
legally qualified nurse duly licensed to practice in another
state whose engagement requires such nurse to accompany and
care for a patient temporarily residing in this state for a
period not to exceed six months;
(8) The practice of any legally qualified nurse who is
employed by the government of the United States or any
bureau, division or agency thereof, while in the discharge
of his or her official duties or to the practice of any
legally qualified nurse serving in the Armed Forces of the
United States while stationed within this state;
(9) Nonmedical nursing care of the sick with or
without compensation when done in connection with the
practice of the religious tenets of any church by adherents
thereof, as long as they do not engage in the practice of
nursing as defined in sections 335.011 to 335.096;

SB 1528 9
(10) The practice of any legally qualified and
licensed nurse of another state, territory, or foreign
country whose responsibilities include transporting patients
into, out of, or through this state while actively engaged
in patient transport that does not exceed forty-eight hours
in this state.
✓